Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3137.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
The Legislature finds the following:
1. Changing clocks seasonally is disruptive to health, safety,
education, and economy;
2. Federal law permits permanent standard time by exemption from
daylight saving time as the only alternative to seasonal changing of
clocks;
3. Permanent daylight saving time has historically been repealed
due to harm to health, safety, education, and economy soon after
trials in World War II and the 1970s Oil Crisis;
Req. No. 14423 Page 1

4. Permanent standard time has historically proven to last
without incident for decades;
5. The Southern Sleep Society, American Academy of Sleep
Medicine, National Sleep Foundation, Sleep Research Society, and
Society for Research on Biological Rhythms advise against permanent
daylight saving time and recommend permanent standard time;
6. Standard time is intended to approximate natural solar time;
and
7. Coordination with contiguous states regarding timekeeping is
essential to convenience of commerce.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 161, O.S.L.
2024 (25 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 90.29), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 90.29. A. The standard time in Oklahoma and in all
political subdivisions of this state is the solar time of the
ninetieth meridian west of Greenwich, commonly known as central
standard time, as defined in Sections 261 and 263 of Title 15 of the
United States Code.
B. Unless or until the condition of subsection C of this section
is fulfilled, the State of Oklahoma, acting under the current
provisions of Section 260a of Title 15 of the United States Code,
shall be exempt from the advancement of standard time known as
daylight saving time, effective only on and after January 1 of the

Req. No. 14423 Page 2

year following or coinciding with exemption from daylight saving
time in any two of the following four:
1. The state of Arkansas;
2. The portion of the state of Kansas that is in the central time
zone;
3. The state of Missouri; and
4. The portion of the state of Texas that is in the central time
zone.
C. If a federal law is passed that authorizes states to observe
daylight saving time year-round, this state shall adopt daylight
saving time as the year-round standard of time for the entire state
and all its political subdivisions.
B. D. This section shall not be construed to affect the
standard time established by federal law governing the movement of
common carriers engaged in interstate commerce or the time for
performance of an act by an officer or department of the United
States, as established by a statute, lawful order, rule, or
regulation of the United States or an agency thereof.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-14423 MAH 01/05/26



Req. No. 14423 Page 3